Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 5
MAIL REGISTRATION AND REGISTRATION
AT VOTER REGISTRATION AGENCIES

1-2-501. Form for mail and agency registration - procedures for registration by mail for first-time electors - additional identifying information to be provided by first-time registrants.

The secretary of state, in consultation with the federal election assistance commission, shall develop an application form that may be used for mail voter registration, voter registration at voter registration agencies, and voter change of address. The form developed must:

Require only such identifying information, including the signature of the applicant and other information such as data relating to previous registration by the applicant, as is necessary to enable the appropriate county clerk and recorder to assess the eligibility of the applicant and to administer voter registration and other parts of the election process;

Include a statement that:

Specifies each eligibility requirement, including citizenship;

Contains an affirmation that the applicant meets each requirement; and

Requires the signature of the applicant, under penalty of perjury;

Include:

The question: "Are you a citizen of the United States of America?" and boxes for the applicant to indicate whether the applicant is or is not a citizen of the United States;

The question "Will you be eighteen years of age on or before election day?" and boxes for the applicant to indicate whether or not the applicant will be eighteen years of age or older on election day;

The statement "If you checked 'no' in response to either of these questions, do not complete this form."; and

A statement informing the applicant that, if the form is submitted by mail and the applicant has not previously voted in the county, or in the state if the statewide voter registration system required by section 1-2-301 is operating, the applicant shall submit with the registration form a copy of identification as defined in section 1-1-104 (19.5), the applicant's driver's license number, or the last four digits of the applicant's social security number, otherwise the applicant will be required to submit a copy of identification with the applicant's mail ballot or absentee ballot.

If an applicant for registration fails on the mail registration form to answer the question specified in sub-subparagraph (A) of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b.5), the state or local election official shall notify the applicant of the failure and provide the applicant with an opportunity to complete the form in a timely manner to allow for the completion of the registration form prior to the next election for federal office.

Not include any requirement for notarization or other formal authentication; and

Include, in print that is identical to that used in the affirmation portion of the application:

A statement of the penalties provided by law for submission of a false voter registration application;

A statement that, if an applicant declines to register to vote, the fact that the applicant has declined to register will remain confidential and will be used only for voter registration purposes; and

A statement that if an applicant does register to vote, the office at which the applicant submits a voter registration application will remain confidential and will be used only for voter registration purposes.

Repealed.

(1.5) Repealed.

Subject to the requirements of paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), in addition to the identifying information required to be provided by the elector pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, a person who applies to register by mail in accordance with this part 5 shall submit with the registration application:

In the case of an elector who has been issued a current and valid Colorado driver's license or a current and valid identification card issued by the department of revenue in accordance with part 3 of article 2 of title 42, C.R.S., the number of the elector's Colorado driver's license or identification card; or

In the case of an elector who has not been issued a current and valid Colorado driver's license or a current and valid identification card issued by the department of revenue in accordance with part 3 of article 2 of title 42, C.R.S., the last four digits of the person's social security number.

If an applicant has not been issued a current and valid Colorado driver's license, has not been issued a current and valid identification card by the department of revenue in accordance with part 3 of article 2 of title 42, C.R.S., and does not have a social security number, the secretary of state shall assign the applicant a number for voter registration purposes in accordance with section 1-2-204 (2.5).

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a Colorado driver's license number, the number of an identification card issued by the department of revenue in accordance with the requirements of part 3 of article 2 of title 42, C.R.S., or the last four digits of the person's social security number shall only be received in satisfaction of the requirements of this subsection (2) where the state or local election official matches the number of the driver's license or identification card or the person's social security number submitted under paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) with an existing state identification record bearing the same number, name, and date of birth as provided in such registration information.

If the elector does not comply with the requirements of this subsection (2), the county clerk and recorder shall not register the elector.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire part added, p. 1762, § 21, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2003:

(1)(b.5) and (2) added, pp. 2076, 2077, §§ 11, 12, effective May 22.

L. 2004:

IP(1) and (1)(b.5)(I)(D) amended, p. 1053, § 4, effective May 21.

L. 2006:

(1)(b.5)(I)(D) and (2)(a) amended and (1.5) and (2)(a.5) added, pp. 2029, 2030, §§ 3, 4, 5, effective June 6.

L. 2007:

(1)(e) added and (1.5)(b) amended, p. 1777, §§ 9, 10, effective June 1; IP(1.5), (2)(a), and (2)(a.5) amended and (2)(c) added, p. 1969, § 6, effective August 3.

L. 2013:

IP(1), IP(1.5), and (1.5)(b) amended and (1)(e) repealed, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 698, § 23, effective May 10.

L. 2016:

(1.5) repealed, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 593, § 81, effective May 18.

Cross references:

In 2013, the introductory portions to subsections (1) and (1.5) and subsection (1.5)(b) were amended and subsection (1)(e) was repealed by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-2-502. Form for agency registration.

In addition to the information required in section 1-2-501, the form used at a voter registration agency shall include:

The question, "If you are not registered to vote where you live now, would you like to apply to register to vote here today?";

If the agency provides public assistance, the statement, "Applying to register or declining to register to vote will not affect the amount of assistance that you will be provided by this agency.";

Boxes for the applicant to check to indicate whether the applicant would like to register or decline to register to vote, together with the statement, in close proximity to the boxes and in prominent type, "IF YOU DO NOT CHECK EITHER BOX, YOU WILL BE CONSIDERED TO HAVE DECIDED NOT TO REGISTER TO VOTE AT THIS TIME.";

The statement, "If you would like help in filling out the voter registration application form, we will help you. The decision whether to seek or accept help is yours. You may fill out the application form in private.".

The statement, "If you believe that someone has interfered with your right to register or to decline to register to vote, your right to privacy in deciding whether to register or in applying to register to vote, or your right to choose your own political party or other political preference, you may file a complaint with the secretary of state." The form shall also include the address and telephone number of the secretary of state.

All agencies providing an opportunity to complete the voter registration forms shall keep copies of all records relating to the completion of the forms for two years. The forms shall not be considered public records but are available to the secretary of state for purposes of compiling data in compliance with the federal "National Voter Registration Act of 1993", 52 U.S.C. sec. 20501 et seq.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire part added, p. 1763, § 21, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2016:

(2) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 573, § 22, effective May 18; (2) amended, (SB 16-189), ch. 210, p. 753, § 3, effective June 6.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (2) by SB 16-189 and SB 16-142 were harmonized.

1-2-502.5. Transfer of voter registration information to secretary of state.

Subject to compliance with all applicable federal laws and regulations, the department of health care policy and financing shall provide to the secretary of state, on a schedule established by the secretary of state, electronic records containing the full name, date of birth, residence address, deliverable mailing address if different from the residence address, and county of residence for each registered and unregistered eligible elector who applies for medical assistance as defined in section 25.5-4-103 (13); except that the department of state shall not use the record of a person who is a program participant in the "Address Confidentiality Program Act", part 21 of article 30 of title 24, for voter registration purposes.

If available, the department of health care policy and financing shall also provide, for each eligible elector, an electronic copy of the elector's signature and the eligible elector's valid Colorado driver's license or identification card number or the last four digits of the elector's social security number.

Upon receiving the electronic record for an unregistered eligible elector that includes all of the information in subsection (1) of this section and either the elector's valid Colorado driver's license or identification card number or the last four digits of the elector's social security number in accordance with subsection (2) of this section, the secretary of state shall provide the information to the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the elector resides. Upon receipt of a record, the county clerk and recorder shall determine if the record is complete for the purposes of voter registration. If the record is not complete, the county clerk and recorder shall send to the person's address of record, by nonforwardable mail, notice that the person has not been registered to vote and stating the additional information required to register. If the person provides the additional information, the person is registered to vote effective on the date of the person's application with the department of health care policy and financing. If the person does not provide the additional information necessary to make his or her application complete and accurate within twenty-four months after the notification is mailed pursuant to this subsection (3), the person's registration is canceled.

If the record is complete for purposes of voter registration, the county clerk and recorder shall send to the person's address of record, by nonforwardable mail, notice that the person has been registered to vote and a postage paid preaddressed return form by which the person may:

Decline to be registered as an elector; or

Affiliate with a political party; and

Provide a signature if, at the time the elector applied for medical assistance, the person did not use a Colorado driver's license or identification number and did not provide an electronic copy of their signature. The form must include information on how the elector can upload a signature electronically.

A notice mailed under subsection (4) of this section must include an explanation, in both English and Spanish, of the eligibility requirements to register to vote, and a statement that, if the person is not eligible, the person should decline to register using the preaddressed return form.

The notice provided under subsection (4) of this section must include a statement that, if a person declines to register to vote, the fact that the person has declined to register will remain confidential and will be used only for voter registration statistics purposes, and a statement that, if the person remains registered to vote, the office at which the person was registered will remain confidential and will be used only for voter registration statistics purposes.

If a notice provided under subsections (3) and (4) of this section is returned as undeliverable within twenty days after the county clerk and recorder mails the notice, the person's registration is canceled and the person is deemed to have never registered. If the notice is returned as undeliverable after twenty days after the county clerk and recorder mails the notice, the person's registration is marked inactive.
(7) (a) (I) If a notice provided under subsections (3) and (4) of this section is returned as undeliverable within twenty days after the county clerk and recorder mails the notice, the person's registration is canceled and the person is deemed to have never registered. If the notice is returned as undeliverable after twenty days after the county clerk and recorder mails the notice, the person's registration is marked inactive.

Notwithstanding subsection (7)(a)(I) of this section, if a person votes in an election after the transfer of the person's record but before the notice is returned as undeliverable, the person's registration shall not be canceled or marked inactive.

If a notice provided under subsection (4) of this section is not returned within twenty days, or if the person returns the form and provides a signature but does not affiliate with a party, the person is registered as of the date of the person's application with the department of health care policy and financing and the person shall be marked as unaffiliated.

If a person returns the form provided under subsection (4) of this section and declines to be registered, including if the person returns the form and both declines to be registered and also affiliates with a party or provides a signature for registration, the person's registration is canceled and the person is deemed to have never registered; except that, if the person has voted in an election, the returned form is of no effect and the person remains registered as of the date of the person's application with the department of health care policy and financing.

If a person returns the form provided under subsection (4) of this section and affiliates with a party, the person is registered as of the date of the person's application with the department of health care policy and financing and the person's affiliation shall be marked effective as of the date the affiliation information was received.

If a person returns the form without selecting any option, the returned form is of no effect. The person is registered as of the date of the person's application with the department of health care policy and financing and shall be marked as unaffiliated.

(7.5) (a) Subject to compliance with all applicable federal laws and regulations, the department of health care policy and financing shall provide to the secretary of state, on a schedule established by the secretary of state, notice of any registered elector who informs the department of a change of name or address. Upon receiving notice of the change of name or address, the secretary of state shall provide the information to the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the elector resides.

The county clerk and recorder of the county in which the elector resides shall change the registration record of the elector to reflect the change of name and address, mark the registration record as "active", and send to the elector's address of record, by forwardable mail, notice of the change, a postage paid preaddressed return form by which the elector may verify or correct the information, and information on how the elector can return a signature or upload a signature electronically if the elector does not have a signature on file.

If the elector returns the form described in subsection (7.5)(b) of this section and indicates that the change was in error, the appropriate county clerk and recorder shall immediately correct the elector's previously updated information in the statewide voter registration database.

After the twenty-day period described in subsection (7) of this section passes, the registration information of a person registered pursuant to this section, including the fact that the person was registered through a voter registration agency, becomes a registration record that must be maintained and made available for public inspection in accordance with section 1-2-227. Information relating to the return of a notice form by a person declining to be registered and information relating to the specific agency at which a person was registered pursuant to this section is not a public record subject to inspection and shall not be used for any purpose other than voter registration statistics.

This section does not preclude the state from complying with its obligations under the federal "National Voter Registration Act of 1993", 52 U.S.C. sec. 20501 et seq., as amended; the federal "Voting Rights Act of 1965", 52 U.S.C. sec. 10101 et seq., as amended; the federal "Help America Vote Act of 2002", 52 U.S.C. sec. 20901 et seq., as amended; or any other applicable federal laws.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-235), ch. 329, p. 3052, § 3, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

(4)(c) and (8) amended and (7.5) added, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1635, § 10, effective June 21.

1-2-502.7. Voter registration agencies - reports - transfer of records for voter registration.

Each state agency that oversees one or more offices designated as voter registration agencies in section 1-2-504 (1)(a) and (1)(b) shall annually provide to the secretary of state a list with each designated office, the type of services the office provides, and a designated voter registration contact for that office.

Each office designated under subsection (1) of this section shall report to the secretary of state each month the number of people who applied for public assistance or who applied to participate in state-funded programs, the number of voter registration choice forms the office collected, and the number of people who received a voter registration form.

At the earliest practicable time, the office of information technology created in section 24-37.5-103 shall assess which voter registration agencies, as defined in section 1-2-504 (1)(a) and (1)(b), collect sufficient information from applicants for voter registration purposes, and shall report its findings to the secretary of state. Upon a determination by the office of information technology and the secretary of state that a voter registration agency collects the necessary information to register an eligible elector, the office of information technology and the secretary of state shall establish a schedule by which the voter registration agency shall begin providing electronic records regarding eligible electors to the secretary of state. The secretary of state and each county clerk and recorder shall process electronic records received from voter registration agencies under this subsection (3) substantially in accordance with section 1-2-502.5.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-235), ch. 329, p. 3054, § 4, effective August 2.

1-2-503. Availability of forms.

The application forms for mail voter registration shall be available for distribution through governmental and private entities, with particular emphasis on making them available for organized voter registration programs.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire part added, p. 1764, § 21, effective January 1, 1995.

1-2-504. Voter registration agencies.

The following offices are designated as voter registration agencies:

All offices that provide public assistance;

All offices that provide state-funded programs primarily engaged in providing services to persons with disabilities;

All recruitment offices of the armed forces of the United States; and

Any other federal, state, local government, or nongovernment office that chooses to provide voter registration service or applications.

The following agencies may provide application forms for mail voter registration:

All offices of county clerk and recorders;

All federal post offices; and

Any other federal, state, local government, or nongovernment office that chooses to provide voter registration service or applications.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire part added, p. 1764, § 21, effective January 1, 1995.

1-2-505. Services at voter registration agencies - services to persons with disabilities.

At each voter registration agency, the following services shall be made available with each application made in person for service or assistance and with each recertification, renewal, or change of address form relating to the service or assistance:

Distribution of mail voter registration application forms;

Assistance to applicants in completing agency voter registration application forms, unless the applicant refuses such assistance; and

Acceptance of completed agency voter registration application forms for transmittal to the appropriate county clerk and recorder.

If a voter registration agency provides services to a person with a disability at the person's home, the agency shall provide the services described in subsection (1) of this section at the person's home.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire part added, p. 1764, § 21, effective January 1, 1995.

1-2-506. Prohibitions.

A person who provides the services described in section 1-2-505 shall not:

Seek to influence an applicant's political preference or party registration;

Display any political preference or party allegiance;

Make any statement to an applicant or take any action, the purpose or effect of which is to discourage the applicant from registering to vote;

Make any statement to an applicant or take any action, the purpose or effect of which is to lead the applicant to believe that a decision to register or not to register has any bearing on the availability of services or benefits.

A person who provides the services described in section 1-2-505 shall ensure that the identity of the voter registration agency through which any particular voter is registered is not disclosed to the public.

No information relating to a declination to register to vote made in connection with an application completed at a voter registration agency may be used for any purpose other than voter registration.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire part added, p. 1765, § 21, effective January 1, 1995.

1-2-507. Transmittal of voter registration applications - when.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a completed agency registration application accepted at a voter registration agency shall be transmitted to the county clerk and recorder not later than five days after the date of acceptance; except that, within twenty-two days before an election, a voter registration agency must transmit completed voter registration applications on a daily basis.

Within eight days before an election, a voter registration agency shall accept the application and immediately inform the applicant that he or she must go to a voter service and polling center in order to vote in that election.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire part added, p. 1765, § 21, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 826, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 699, § 24, effective May 10.

L. 2014:

(2) amended, (SB 14-161), ch. 160, p. 559, § 9, effective May 9.

L. 2016:

(1) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 574, § 23, effective May 18.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-2-508. Receipt of voter registration applications - effective dates - legislative intent.

The county clerk and recorder shall ensure that any eligible applicant is registered to vote and has been mailed a ballot in an election if:

In the case of registration with a driver's license application, the valid voter registration application of the applicant is accepted by a driver's license examination facility no later than eight days before the date of an election;

In the case of registration through the online voter registration system established pursuant to section 1-2-202.5, the application is submitted no later than the eighth day before the date of the election;

In the case of registration by mail, the valid voter registration application of the applicant is postmarked not later than eight days before the date of the election;

In the case of registration by mail where the application has no postmark, the date of registration is the date that the application is received;

In the case of registration at a voter registration agency, the valid agency voter registration application of the applicant is accepted at the voter registration agency not later than eight days before the date of the election;

In the case of registration through a voter registration drive, the valid voter registration is submitted no later than twenty-two days before an election; and

In any other case, the valid voter registration application of the applicant is received by the appropriate county clerk and recorder not later than eight days before the date of the election, except as otherwise permitted by section 1-2-217.7.

The effective date of a voter registration application or change of registration that is completed at the office of the county clerk and recorder or in the presence of a deputy registrar is the date received by the office of the county clerk and recorder or by the registrar.

The effective date of an application or change of registration that is completed at a driver's license examination facility or voter registration agency is the date that the application or change is accepted by the facility or agency.

The effective date of a voter registration application or change of registration that is completed by a mail registration form is the date of the postmark or receipt by the county clerk and recorder, whichever is earlier.

The effective date of a voter registration application or change of registration made at a voter service and polling center pursuant to section 1-2-217.7 is the date that the application is made by the elector.

Notwithstanding the voter registration application deadlines contained in this section and this code, a county clerk and recorder shall accept and process a voter registration application received after the deadlines specified in subsection (1) of this section, including applications received through the online voter registration system. Any person who submits a voter registration application within eight days of an election shall be informed that he or she will not receive a mail ballot but may either pick up a ballot in person or vote in person at a voter service and polling center.
(3) (a) (I) Notwithstanding the voter registration application deadlines contained in this section and this code, a county clerk and recorder shall accept and process a voter registration application received after the deadlines specified in subsection (1) of this section, including applications received through the online voter registration system. Any person who submits a voter registration application within eight days of an election shall be informed that he or she will not receive a mail ballot but may either pick up a ballot in person or vote in person at a voter service and polling center.

It is the general assembly's intent, in enacting this paragraph (a), to use modern technology to maximize the efficiency of operations at voter service and polling centers by allowing the continuous processing of voter registration applications for eligible persons in accordance with this article.

If a voter has already cast a ballot in an election, and submits an application after casting the ballot, the county clerk and recorder shall defer processing that voter's application until after the close of the election.

Commencing the fifteenth day before an election through the eighth day before an election, the county clerk and recorder shall process all voter registration applications and updates to voter registration records that require a new ballot to be sent to an elector within two business days of the receipt of the application or update by the county clerk.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire part added, p. 1765, § 21, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(1) amended and (2) added, p. 826, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1)(c) amended, p. 474, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1)(a) and (1)(c) amended, p. 759, § 13, effective May 20.

L. 2013:

(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), (1)(e), and (2) amended and (1)(a.5) added, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 699, § 25, effective May 10.

L. 2014:

(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(d), and (1)(e) amended; and (1)(f) and (3) added, (SB 14-161), ch. 160, p. 559, § 10, effective May 9.

L. 2020:

IP(1) amended and (3)(c) added, (HB 20-1313), ch. 260, p. 1254, § 1, effective September 14.

Cross references:

In 2013, subsections (1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), (1)(e), and (2) were amended and subsection (1)(a.5) was added by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-2-509. Reviewing voter registration applications - notification.

Upon receipt of an application, if the applicant resides in a county other than the county receiving the application, the county clerk and recorder shall within five days transmit the application to the clerk and recorder of the applicant's county; except that, if the application is received thirty days or less before an election, the application shall be transmitted as expeditiously as possible.

Upon receipt of an application, the county clerk and recorder shall verify that the application is complete and accurate. If the application is complete and accurate, the county clerk and recorder shall notify the applicant of the registration. If the application is not complete or is inaccurate, the county clerk and recorder shall notify the applicant, stating the additional information required.

Within ten business days after receipt of the application, the county clerk and recorder shall notify each applicant of the disposition of the application by nonforwardable mail and proceed in accordance with paragraph (b) of this subsection (3).

If within twenty business days after receipt of the application the notification is returned to the county clerk and recorder as undeliverable, the applicant shall not be registered.

If the notification is not returned within twenty business days as undeliverable, then the applicant shall be deemed registered as of the date of the application; except that, if the applicant was notified that the application was not complete, then the applicant is deemed registered as of the date of the application if the additional information is provided at any time prior to the actual voting. If such applicant does not provide the additional information necessary to make his or her application complete and accurate within twenty-four months after notification is sent pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the applicant must reapply in order to be registered.

If the notification is returned to the county clerk and recorder as undeliverable after twenty days after receipt of the application, the county clerk and recorder shall mark the applicant's registration record "Inactive" and send a confirmation card.

This section does not apply to voter registrations received pursuant to section 1-2-213, 1-2-213.3, or 1-2-502.5.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire part added, p. 1766, § 21, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 827, § 22, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(3) amended, p. 1396, § 9, effective June 6; (3) amended, p. 1431, § 9, effective June 6.

L. 2012:

(3) amended, (HB 12-1292), ch. 181, p. 678, § 6, effective May 17.

L. 2016:

(3) amended, (HB 16-1093), ch. 126, p. 360, § 4, effective April 21.

L. 2019:

(4) added, (SB 19-235), ch. 329, p. 3057, § 10, effective August 2.

1-2-510. Public disclosure of voter registration activities.

The secretary of state shall maintain for at least two years and shall make available for public inspection and copying at a reasonable cost, all records concerning the implementation of programs and activities conducted for the purpose of ensuring the accuracy and currency of official lists of eligible voters, except to the extent that the records relate to a declination to register to vote or to the identity of a voter registration agency through which any particular voter is registered.

The records maintained pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall include lists of the names and addresses of all persons to whom confirmation notices are sent and information concerning whether or not each person has responded to the notice as of the date that inspection of the records is made.

The secretary of state is also responsible for filing any reports or information concerning the implementation of the federal "National Voter Registration Act of 1993", 52 U.S.C. sec. 20501 et seq., with the federal election commission as may be required.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire part added, p. 1766, § 21, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 97:

(2) amended, p. 475, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(3) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 574, § 24, effective May 18; (3) amended, (SB 16-189), ch. 210, p. 754, § 4, effective June 6.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (3) by SB 16-142 and SB 16-189 were harmonized.

1-2-511. Prosecutions of violations.

Any person who believes a violation of this part 5 has occurred may file a written complaint no later than sixty days after the date of the violation with the secretary of state. If the secretary of state determines, after a hearing, that the violation has occurred, he or she shall so notify the attorney general, who may institute a civil action for relief, including a permanent or temporary injunction, a restraining order, or any other appropriate order, in the district court. Upon a proper showing that such person has engaged or is about to engage in any prohibited acts or practices, a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or other order shall be granted without bond by the court. If, within one hundred twenty days after a complaint is filed with the secretary of state, no civil action for relief is instituted by the attorney general, the complainant shall have a private right of action based on an alleged violation of this part 5 and may institute a civil action in district court for any appropriate remedy. Any such action shall be filed within one year from the date of the alleged violation.

Unless a person intentionally takes voluntary action to register to vote knowing that he or she is not eligible to register, the transfer of the person's electronic record by a voter registration agency in accordance with section 1-2-213.3 or 1-2-502.5 does not constitute the completion of a voter registration form by that person. If such a registration is processed by the state, it is presumed to have been officially authorized by the state and the person is not subject to any penalty under this code.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire part added, p. 1767, § 21, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-235), ch. 329, p. 3054, § 5, effective August 2.